Illinois, session 104th, SB3447.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 408 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/408)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1020)7    Sec. 408. Fees and charges. 8    (1) The Director shall charge, collect and give proper 9acquittances for the payment of the following fees and 10charges:11        (a) For filing all documents submitted for the 12    incorporation or organization or certification of a 13    domestic company, except for a fraternal benefit society, 14    $2,000.15        (b) For filing all documents submitted for the 16    incorporation or organization of a fraternal benefit 17    society, $500.18        (c) For filing amendments to articles of incorporation 19    and amendments to declaration of organization, except for 20    a fraternal benefit society, a mutual benefit association, 21    a burial society or a farm mutual, $200.22        (d) For filing amendments to articles of incorporation 23    of a fraternal benefit society, a mutual benefit   SB3447- 2 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1    association or a burial society, $100.2        (e) For filing amendments to articles of incorporation 3    of a farm mutual, $50.4        (f) For filing bylaws or amendments thereto, $50.5        (g) For filing agreement of merger or consolidation:6            (i) for a domestic company, except for a fraternal 7        benefit society, a mutual benefit association, a 8        burial society, or a farm mutual, $2,000.9            (ii) for a foreign or alien company, except for a 10        fraternal benefit society, $600.11            (iii) for a fraternal benefit society, a mutual 12        benefit association, a burial society, or a farm 13        mutual, $200.14        (h) For filing agreements of reinsurance by a domestic 15    company, $200.16        (i) For filing all documents submitted by a foreign or 17    alien company to be admitted to transact business or 18    accredited as a reinsurer in this State, except for a 19    fraternal benefit society, $5,000.20        (j) For filing all documents submitted by a foreign or 21    alien fraternal benefit society to be admitted to transact 22    business in this State, $500.23        (k) For filing declaration of withdrawal of a foreign 24    or alien company, $50.25        (l) For filing annual statement by a domestic company, 26    except a fraternal benefit society, a mutual benefit   SB3447- 3 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1    association, a burial society, or a farm mutual, $200.2        (m) For filing annual statement by a domestic 3    fraternal benefit society, $100.4        (n) For filing annual statement by a farm mutual, a 5    mutual benefit association, or a burial society, $50.6        (o) For issuing a certificate of authority or renewal 7    thereof except to a foreign fraternal benefit society, 8    $400.9        (p) For issuing a certificate of authority or renewal 10    thereof to a foreign fraternal benefit society, $200.11        (q) For issuing an amended certificate of authority, 12    $50.13        (r) For each certified copy of certificate of 14    authority, $20.15        (s) For each certificate of deposit, or valuation, or 16    compliance or surety certificate, $20.17        (t) For copies of papers or records per page, $1.18        (u) For each certification to copies of papers or 19    records, $10.20        (v) For multiple copies of documents or certificates 21    listed in subparagraphs (r), (s), and (u) of paragraph (1) 22    of this Section, $10 for the first copy of a certificate of 23    any type and $5 for each additional copy of the same 24    certificate requested at the same time, unless, pursuant 25    to paragraph (2) of this Section, the Director finds these 26    additional fees excessive.  SB3447- 4 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1        (w) For issuing a permit to sell shares or increase 2    paid-up capital:3            (i) in connection with a public stock offering, 4        $300;5            (ii) in any other case, $100.6        (x) For issuing any other certificate required or 7    permissible under the law, $50.8        (y) For filing a plan of exchange of the stock of a 9    domestic stock insurance company, a plan of 10    demutualization of a domestic mutual company, or a plan of 11    reorganization under Article XII, $2,000.12        (z) For filing a statement of acquisition of a 13    domestic company as defined in Section 131.4 of this Code, 14    $2,000.15        (aa) For filing an agreement to purchase the business 16    of an organization authorized under the Dental Service 17    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act or of a 18    health maintenance organization or a limited health 19    service organization, $2,000.20        (bb) For filing a statement of acquisition of a 21    foreign or alien insurance company as defined in Section 22    131.12a of this Code, $1,000.23        (cc) For filing a registration statement as required 24    in Sections 131.13 and 131.14, the notification as 25    required by Sections 131.16, 131.20a, or 141.4, or an 26    agreement or transaction required by Sections 124.2(2),   SB3447- 5 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1    141, 141a, or 141.1, $200.2        (dd) For filing an application for licensing of:3            (i) a religious or charitable risk pooling trust 4        or a workers' compensation pool, $1,000;5            (ii) a workers' compensation service company, 6        $500;7            (iii) a self-insured automobile fleet, $200; or8            (iv) a renewal of or amendment of any license 9        issued pursuant to (i), (ii), or (iii) above, $100.10        (ee) For filing articles of incorporation for a 11    syndicate to engage in the business of insurance through 12    the Illinois Insurance Exchange, $2,000.13        (ff) For filing amended articles of incorporation for 14    a syndicate engaged in the business of insurance through 15    the Illinois Insurance Exchange, $100.16        (gg) For filing articles of incorporation for a 17    limited syndicate to join with other subscribers or 18    limited syndicates to do business through the Illinois 19    Insurance Exchange, $1,000.20        (hh) For filing amended articles of incorporation for 21    a limited syndicate to do business through the Illinois 22    Insurance Exchange, $100.23        (ii) For a permit to solicit subscriptions to a 24    syndicate or limited syndicate, $100.25        (jj) For the filing of each form as required in 26    Section 143 of this Code, $50 per form. Informational and   SB3447- 6 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1    advertising filings shall be $25 per filing. The fee for 2    advisory and rating organizations shall be $200 per form.3            (i) For the purposes of the form filing fee, 4        filings made on insert page basis will be considered 5        one form at the time of its original submission. 6        Changes made to a form subsequent to its approval 7        shall be considered a new filing.8            (ii) Only one fee shall be charged for a form, 9        regardless of the number of other forms or policies 10        with which it will be used.11            (iii) Fees charged for a policy filed as it will be 12        issued regardless of the number of forms comprising 13        that policy shall not exceed $1,500. For advisory or 14        rating organizations, fees charged for a policy filed 15        as it will be issued regardless of the number of forms 16        comprising that policy shall not exceed $2,500.17            (iv) The Director may by rule exempt forms from 18        such fees.19        (kk) For filing an application for licensing of a 20    reinsurance intermediary, $500.21        (ll) For filing an application for renewal of a 22    license of a reinsurance intermediary, $200.23        (mm) For filing a plan of division of a domestic stock 24    company under Article IIB, $100,000. 25        (nn) For filing all documents submitted by a foreign 26    or alien company to be a certified reinsurer in this   SB3447- 7 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1    State, except for a fraternal benefit society, $1,000. 2        (oo) For filing a renewal by a foreign or alien 3    company to be a certified reinsurer in this State, except 4    for a fraternal benefit society, $400. 5        (pp) For filing all documents submitted by a reinsurer 6    domiciled in a reciprocal jurisdiction, $1,000. 7        (qq) For filing a renewal by a reinsurer domiciled in 8    a reciprocal jurisdiction, $400. 9        (rr) For registering a captive management company or 10    renewal thereof, $50. 11        (ss) For filing an insurance business transfer plan 12    under Article XLVII, $100,000. 13    (2) When printed copies or numerous copies of the same 14paper or records are furnished or certified, the Director may 15reduce such fees for copies if he finds them excessive. He may, 16when he considers it in the public interest, furnish without 17charge to state insurance departments and persons other than 18companies, copies or certified copies of reports of 19examinations and of other papers and records.20    (3)(a) The expenses incurred in any performance 21examination authorized by law shall be paid by the company or 22person being examined. The charge shall be consistent with 23that otherwise authorized by law and shall be reasonably 24related to the cost of the examination, including, but not 25limited to, compensation of examiners, electronic data 26processing costs, supervision and preparation of an   SB3447- 8 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1examination report, and lodging and travel expenses. All 2lodging and travel expenses shall be in accord with the 3applicable travel regulations as published by the Department 4of Central Management Services and approved by the Governor's 5Travel Control Board, except that out-of-state lodging and 6travel expenses related to examinations authorized under 7Section 132 shall be in accordance with travel rates 8prescribed under paragraph 301-7.2 of the Federal Travel 9Regulations, 41 CFR 301-7.2, for reimbursement of subsistence 10expenses incurred during official travel. All lodging and 11travel expenses may be reimbursed directly upon authorization 12of the Director. With the exception of the direct 13reimbursements authorized by the Director, all performance 14examination charges collected by the Department shall be paid 15to the Insurance Producer Administration Fund, however, the 16electronic data processing costs incurred by the Department in 17the performance of any examination shall be billed directly to 18the company being examined for payment to the Technology 19Management Revolving Fund.20    (b) The costs and fees incurred in a market conduct 21examination shall be itemized and bills shall be provided to 22the examinee on a monthly basis for review prior to submission 23for payment. The Director shall review and affirmatively 24endorse detailed billings from any contracted, qualified 25outside professional assistance retained under Section 402 for 26market conduct examinations before the detailed billings are   SB3447- 9 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1sent to the examinee. Before any qualified outside 2professional assistance conducts billable work on an 3examination, the Department shall disclose to the examinee the 4terms of the contracts with the qualified outside professional 5assistance that will be used, including the fees and hourly 6rates that can be charged. 7    (4) At the time of any service of process on the Director 8as attorney for such service, the Director shall charge and 9collect the sum of $40, which may be recovered as taxable costs 10by the party to the suit or action causing such service to be 11made if he prevails in such suit or action.12    (5)(a) The costs incurred by the Department of Insurance 13in conducting any hearing authorized by law shall be assessed 14against the parties to the hearing in such proportion as the 15Director of Insurance may determine upon consideration of all 16relevant circumstances including: (1) the nature of the 17hearing; (2) whether the hearing was instigated by, or for the 18benefit of a particular party or parties; (3) whether there is 19a successful party on the merits of the proceeding; and (4) the 20relative levels of participation by the parties.21    (b) For purposes of this subsection (5) costs incurred 22shall mean the hearing officer fees, court reporter fees, and 23travel expenses of Department of Insurance officers and 24employees; provided however, that costs incurred shall not 25include hearing officer fees or court reporter fees unless the 26Department has retained the services of independent   SB3447- 10 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1contractors or outside experts to perform such functions.2    (c) The Director shall make the assessment of costs 3incurred as part of the final order or decision arising out of 4the proceeding; provided, however, that such order or decision 5shall include findings and conclusions in support of the 6assessment of costs. This subsection (5) shall not be 7construed as permitting the payment of travel expenses unless 8calculated in accordance with the applicable travel 9regulations of the Department of Central Management Services, 10as approved by the Governor's Travel Control Board. The 11Director as part of such order or decision shall require all 12assessments for hearing officer fees and court reporter fees, 13if any, to be paid directly to the hearing officer or court 14reporter by the party or parties assessed for such costs. The 15assessments for travel expenses of Department officers and 16employees shall be reimbursable to the Director of Insurance 17for deposit to the fund out of which those expenses had been 18paid.19    (d) The provisions of this subsection (5) shall apply in 20the case of any hearing conducted by the Director of Insurance 21not otherwise specifically provided for by law.22    (6) The Director shall charge and collect an annual 23financial regulation fee from every domestic company for 24examination and analysis of its financial condition and to 25fund the internal costs and expenses of the Interstate 26Insurance Receivership Commission as may be allocated to the   SB3447- 11 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1State of Illinois and companies doing an insurance business in 2this State pursuant to Article X of the Interstate Insurance 3Receivership Compact. The fee shall be the greater fixed 4amount based upon the combination of nationwide direct premium 5income and nationwide reinsurance assumed premium income or 6upon admitted assets calculated under this subsection as 7follows:8        (a) Combination of nationwide direct premium income 9    and nationwide reinsurance assumed premium.10            (i) $300 $150, if the premium is less than 11        $500,000 and there is no reinsurance assumed premium;12            (ii) $1,500 $750, if the premium is $500,000 or 13        more, but less than $5,000,000 and there is no 14        reinsurance assumed premium; or if the premium is less 15        than $5,000,000 and the reinsurance assumed premium is 16        less than $10,000,000;17            (iii) $7,500 $3,750, if the premium is less than 18        $5,000,000 and the reinsurance assumed premium is 19        $10,000,000 or more;20            (iv) $15,000 $7,500, if the premium is $5,000,000 21        or more, but less than $10,000,000;22            (v) $36,000 $18,000, if the premium is $10,000,000 23        or more, but less than $25,000,000;24            (vi) $45,000 $22,500, if the premium is 25        $25,000,000 or more, but less than $50,000,000;26            (vii) $60,000 $30,000, if the premium is   SB3447- 12 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1        $50,000,000 or more, but less than $100,000,000;2            (viii) $75,000 $37,500, if the premium is 3        $100,000,000 or more.4        (b) Admitted assets.5            (i) $300 $150, if admitted assets are less than 6        $1,000,000;7            (ii) $1,500 $750, if admitted assets are 8        $1,000,000 or more, but less than $5,000,000;9            (iii) $7,500 $3,750, if admitted assets are 10        $5,000,000 or more, but less than $25,000,000;11            (iv) $15,000 $7,500, if admitted assets are 12        $25,000,000 or more, but less than $50,000,000;13            (v) $36,000 $18,000, if admitted assets are 14        $50,000,000 or more, but less than $100,000,000;15            (vi) $45,000 $22,500, if admitted assets are 16        $100,000,000 or more, but less than $500,000,000;17            (vii) $60,000 $30,000, if admitted assets are 18        $500,000,000 or more, but less than $1,000,000,000;19            (viii) $75,000 $37,500, if admitted assets are 20        $1,000,000,000 or more.21        (c) The sum of financial regulation fees charged to 22    the domestic companies of the same affiliated group shall 23    not exceed $500,000 $250,000 in the aggregate in any 24    single year and shall be billed by the Director to the 25    member company designated by the group.26    (7) The Director shall charge and collect an annual   SB3447- 13 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1financial regulation fee from every foreign or alien company, 2except fraternal benefit societies, for the examination and 3analysis of its financial condition and to fund the internal 4costs and expenses of the Interstate Insurance Receivership 5Commission as may be allocated to the State of Illinois and 6companies doing an insurance business in this State pursuant 7to Article X of the Interstate Insurance Receivership Compact. 8The fee shall be a fixed amount based upon Illinois direct 9premium income and nationwide reinsurance assumed premium 10income in accordance with the following schedule:11        (a) $300 $150, if the premium is less than $500,000 12    and there is no reinsurance assumed premium;13        (b) $1,500 $750, if the premium is $500,000 or more, 14    but less than $5,000,000 and there is no reinsurance 15    assumed premium; or if the premium is less than $5,000,000 16    and the reinsurance assumed premium is less than 17    $10,000,000;18        (c) $7,500 $3,750, if the premium is less than 19    $5,000,000 and the reinsurance assumed premium is 20    $10,000,000 or more;21        (d) $15,000 $7,500, if the premium is $5,000,000 or 22    more, but less than $10,000,000;23        (e) $36,000 $18,000, if the premium is $10,000,000 or 24    more, but less than $25,000,000;25        (f) $45,000 $22,500, if the premium is $25,000,000 or 26    more, but less than $50,000,000;  SB3447- 14 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1        (g) $60,000 $30,000, if the premium is $50,000,000 or 2    more, but less than $100,000,000;3        (h) $75,000 $37,500, if the premium is $100,000,000 or 4    more.5    The sum of financial regulation fees under this subsection 6(7) charged to the foreign or alien companies within the same 7affiliated group shall not exceed $500,000 $250,000 in the 8aggregate in any single year and shall be billed by the 9Director to the member company designated by the group.10    (8) Beginning January 1, 1992, the financial regulation 11fees imposed under subsections (6) and (7) of this Section 12shall be paid by each company or domestic affiliated group 13annually. After January 1, 1994, the fee shall be billed by 14Department invoice based upon the company's premium income or 15admitted assets as shown in its annual statement for the 16preceding calendar year. The invoice is due upon receipt and 17must be paid no later than June 30 of each calendar year. All 18financial regulation fees collected by the Department shall be 19paid to the Insurance Financial Regulation Fund. The 20Department may not collect financial examiner per diem charges 21from companies subject to subsections (6) and (7) of this 22Section undergoing financial examination after June 30, 1992. 23Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 24104th General Assembly, the Department may amend the fees 25imposed under subsections (6) and (7) by rule. 26    (9) In addition to the financial regulation fee required   SB3447- 15 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1by this Section, a company undergoing any financial 2examination authorized by law shall pay the following costs 3and expenses incurred by the Department: electronic data 4processing costs, the expenses authorized under Section 131.21 5and subsection (d) of Section 132.4 of this Code, and lodging 6and travel expenses.7    Electronic data processing costs incurred by the 8Department in the performance of any examination shall be 9billed directly to the company undergoing examination for 10payment to the Technology Management Revolving Fund. Except 11for direct reimbursements authorized by the Director or direct 12payments made under Section 131.21 or subsection (d) of 13Section 132.4 of this Code, all financial regulation fees and 14all financial examination charges collected by the Department 15shall be paid to the Insurance Financial Regulation Fund.16    All lodging and travel expenses shall be in accordance 17with applicable travel regulations published by the Department 18of Central Management Services and approved by the Governor's 19Travel Control Board, except that out-of-state lodging and 20travel expenses related to examinations authorized under 21Sections 132.1 through 132.7 shall be in accordance with 22travel rates prescribed under paragraph 301-7.2 of the Federal 23Travel Regulations, 41 CFR 301-7.2, for reimbursement of 24subsistence expenses incurred during official travel. All 25lodging and travel expenses may be reimbursed directly upon 26the authorization of the Director.  SB3447- 16 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1    In the case of an organization or person not subject to the 2financial regulation fee, the expenses incurred in any 3financial examination authorized by law shall be paid by the 4organization or person being examined. The charge shall be 5reasonably related to the cost of the examination including, 6but not limited to, compensation of examiners and other costs 7described in this subsection.8    (10) Any company, person, or entity failing to make any 9payment of $150 or more as required under this Section shall be 10subject to the penalty and interest provisions provided for in 11subsections (4) and (7) of Section 412.12    (11) Unless otherwise specified, all of the fees collected 13under this Section shall be paid into the Insurance Financial 14Regulation Fund.15    (12) For purposes of this Section:16        (a) "Domestic company" means a company as defined in 17    Section 2 of this Code which is incorporated or organized 18    under the laws of this State, and in addition includes a 19    not-for-profit corporation authorized under the Dental 20    Service Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans 21    Act, a health maintenance organization, and a limited 22    health service organization.23        (b) "Foreign company" means a company as defined in 24    Section 2 of this Code which is incorporated or organized 25    under the laws of any state of the United States other than 26    this State and in addition includes a health maintenance   SB3447- 17 -LRB104 18376 BAB 31818 b1    organization and a limited health service organization 2    which is incorporated or organized under the laws of any 3    state of the United States other than this State.4        (c) "Alien company" means a company as defined in 5    Section 2 of this Code which is incorporated or organized 6    under the laws of any country other than the United 7    States.8        (d) "Fraternal benefit society" means a corporation, 9    society, order, lodge or voluntary association as defined 10    in Section 282.1 of this Code.11        (e) "Mutual benefit association" means a company, 12    association or corporation authorized by the Director to 13    do business in this State under the provisions of Article 14    XVIII of this Code.15        (f) "Burial society" means a person, firm, 16    corporation, society or association of individuals 17    authorized by the Director to do business in this State 18    under the provisions of Article XIX of this Code.19        (g) "Farm mutual" means a district, county and 20    township mutual insurance company authorized by the 21    Director to do business in this State under the provisions 22    of the Farm Mutual Insurance Company Act of 1986.23(Source: P.A. 103-75, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 24103-897, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)